Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-141
Militia; commissioned officers; power of arrest.

Any commissioned officer of the military forces shall have the ordinary powers of a peace officer to arrest and detain any member of the military forces of the State of Nebraska for the commission of any crime punishable under the laws of the state while in any active service of the state. The arresting officer may release the offender to the civil authorities for prosecution.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 70, p. 386;

R.S.1913, § 3968;

C.S.1922, § 3366;

C.S.1929, § 55-184;

R.S.1943, § 55-120;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 39, p. 1594.